District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-632

Uniform application of examinations, inspection, and rules and regulations.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1915, 38 Stat. 915, ch. 80, § 1
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(d), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-312.
1973 Ed., § 33-321.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 8(d) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(d) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(d) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).